California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 133.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14197.05.

(a) As part of the federally required external quality review organization (EQRO) review of Medi-Cal managed care plans in the annual detailed technical report required by Section 438.364 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, effective for contract periods commencing on or after July 1, 2018, the EQRO designated by the department shall compile the data described in subdivision (b), by plan and by county, for the purpose of informing the status of implementation of the requirements of Section 14197.

(b) (1) The information compiled by the EQRO shall include all of the following:

(A) Number of requests for alternative access standards in the plan service area for time and distance, categorized by provider types, including specialists, and by adult and pediatric.

(B) Number of allowable exceptions for the appointment time standard, if known, categorized by provider types, including
 specialists, and by adult and pediatric.

(C) Distance and driving time between the nearest network provider and ZIP Code of the beneficiary furthest from that provider for requests for alternative access standards.

(D) Approximate number of beneficiaries impacted by alternative access standards or allowable exceptions.

(E) Percentage of providers in the plan service area, by provider and specialty type, that are under a contract with a Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(F) The number of requests for alternative access standards approved or denied by ZIP Code and provider and specialty type, and the reasons for the approval or denial of the request for alternative
 access standards. If an approval is authorized, the reasons for approval shall identify whether the approval was granted for either of the following reasons:

(i) A provider was not located in the requested ZIP Code.

(ii) The Medi-Cal managed care plan was unable to enter into a contract with a provider or providers in the requested ZIP Code.

(G) The process of ensuring out-of-network access.

(H) Descriptions of contracting efforts and explanation for why a contract was not executed.

(I) Timeframe for approval or denial of a request for alternative access standards by the department.

(J) Consumer complaints, if any.

(2) The information described in paragraph (1) shall be presented in a chart format to enable comparison among counties, provider types, and
 plans.

(c) The EQRO shall develop a methodology to assess information that will help inform the experience of individuals placed in a skilled nursing facility or intermediate care facility and the distance that they are placed from their place of residence. The EQRO shall report the results from the use of this methodology in the EQRO annual Medi-Cal managed care plan technical report.

(d) The department shall comply with the requirements of subsection (c) of Section 438.364 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations in making the information described in this section publicly available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 465, Sec. 5.   (AB 1642)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14197.07.

(a) A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall ensure access to care for latent tuberculosis infection and active tuberculosis disease and coordination with local health department tuberculosis control programs for plan enrollees with active
 tuberculosis disease, including, but not limited to, both of the following:

(1) Arranging for and coordinating outpatient diagnostic and treatment services to all plan enrollees with suspected or active tuberculosis disease to minimize delays in initiating isolation and treatment of infectious patients. These outpatient services shall include physical examination, drug therapy, laboratory testing, and radiology.

(2) Consulting with local health departments to assess the risk of noncompliance with drug therapy for each plan enrollee who requires placement on
 antituberculosis drug therapy, in accordance with the plan’s existing contract with the department.

(b) For purposes of this section, “Medi-Cal managed care plan” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 14197.08.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 951, Sec. 3.   (AB 2132)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14197.08.

(a) A contract between the department and a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall require the Medi-Cal managed care plan to do both of the following:

(1) Identify, on a quarterly basis, every enrollee who is a child without a record of completing the blood lead screening tests required pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 37100) of Division 1 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) On a quarterly basis, remind the contracting network provider who is a health care provider responsible for performing the periodic health assessment of the child enrollee pursuant to Section 37100 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations of the
 requirement to perform required blood lead screening tests for that child, and the requirement to provide oral or written anticipatory guidance to a parent or guardian of the child, including at a minimum, the information that children may be harmed by exposure to lead.

(b) The department shall develop and implement procedures, and may impose sanctions pursuant to Section 14197.7, to ensure that a Medi-Cal managed care plan is compliant with the requirements specified in subdivision (a).

(1) As part of these procedures, the department shall require a Medi-Cal managed care plan to maintain a record of all child enrollees six years of age or younger who have missed a required blood lead screening and identify the age at which the required blood lead screenings were missed, including which children are without any record of a completed blood lead screening at each age, and provide
 that record to the department annually and upon request for auditing and compliance purposes.

(2) If the child enrollee, or the child enrollee’s parent, guardian, or authorized representative refuses a required blood lead screening test, the Medi-Cal managed care plan shall ensure a statement of voluntary refusal is signed by the child enrollee, if an emancipated minor, or by the child enrollee’s parent, guardian, or authorized representative, and is documented in the child enrollee’s medical record. If the refusing party declines to sign the statement of voluntary refusal, it shall be noted in the child enrollee’s medical record. Documented unsuccessful attempts to provide the blood lead screening tests shall be considered evidence of the Medi-Cal managed care plan meeting the requirements in subdivision (a).

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” means an individual, organization, or entity that enters into a contract with the department to provide general health care services to enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to any of the following:

(A) Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 101675) of Part 4 of Division 101 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3), excluding dental managed care programs developed pursuant to Section 14087.46.

(C) Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5).

(D) Article 2.81 (commencing with Section 14087.96).

(E) Article 2.82 (commencing with Section 14087.98).

(F) Article 2.9 (commencing with Section 14088).

(G) Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089).

(H) Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), excluding dental managed care programs developed pursuant to Section 14087.46.

(2) “Network provider” has the same meaning as in Section 438.2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory
 action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 216, Sec. 3.   (AB 2276)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14197.09.

(a) (1) No later than 12 months after the working group develops its recommendations for curriculum pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 150950 of the Health and Safety Code, and no later than March 1, 2025, a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall require all of its subcontractors, downstream subcontractors, and all of its managed care plan staff who are in direct contact with beneficiaries in the delivery of care or beneficiary services to
 complete evidence-based cultural competency training for the purpose of providing trans-inclusive health care for individuals who identify as transgender, gender diverse, or intersex (TGI).

(2) An evidence-based cultural competency training implemented pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include all of the following:

(A) Information about the effects, including, but not limited to, ongoing personal effects, of historical and contemporary exclusion and oppression of TGI communities.

(B) Information about communicating more effectively across gender identities, including TGI-inclusive terminology, using people’s correct names and pronouns, even when they are not reflected in records or legal documents; avoiding language,
 whether verbal or nonverbal, that demeans, ridicules, or condemns TGI individuals; and avoiding making assumptions about gender identity by using gender-neutral language and avoiding language that presumes all individuals are heterosexual, cisgender or gender conforming, or nonintersex.

(C) Discussion on health inequities within the TGI community, including family and community acceptance.

(D) Perspectives of diverse, local constituency groups and TGI-serving organizations, including, but not limited to, the California Transgender Advisory Council.

(E) Recognition of the difference between personal values and professional responsibilities with regard to serving TGI people.

(F) Facilitation by TGI-serving organizations.

(3) Cultural competency training implemented by a Medi-Cal managed care plan that includes TGI components, as required by its managed care plan contract with the department, shall meet this requirement. This cultural competency training shall consider recommendations made by the working group pursuant to Section 150950 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) Use of any training curricula for purposes of implementing paragraph
 (1) shall be subject to approval by the department, following stakeholder engagement with local constituency groups and TGI-serving organizations, including, but not limited to, the California Transgender Advisory Council.

(5) After first-time completion of the evidence-based cultural competency training, in the form of initial basic training, an individual described in paragraph (1) shall complete a refresher course if a complaint has been filed, and a decision has been made in favor of the complainant, against that individual for not providing trans-inclusive health care, or on a more frequent
 basis if deemed necessary by the Medi-Cal managed care plan or the department for purposes of providing trans-inclusive health care.

(b) (1) No later than 12 months after the working group develops its recommendations for curriculum pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 150950 of the Health and Safety Code, and no later than March 1, 2025, the department shall develop and implement procedures, and may impose sanctions pursuant to Section 14197.7, to ensure that a Medi-Cal managed care plan is compliant with the requirements described in subdivision (a).

(2) The department shall track and
 monitor complaints received by the department related to trans-inclusive health care and publicly report this data with other complaint data on its website or with other public reports containing complaint data.

(c) No later than 12 months after the working group develops its recommendations for curriculum pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 150950 of the Health and Safety Code, and no later than March 1, 2025, a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall include information within or accessible from the plan’s provider directory, and accessible through the plan’s call center, that identifies which of
 the Medi-Cal managed care plan’s in-network providers have affirmed that they offer and have provided gender-affirming services, including, but not limited to, feminizing mammoplasty, male chest reconstruction, mastectomy, gender-confirming facial surgery, hysterectomy, oophorectomy, penectomy, orchiectomy, feminizing genitoplasty, metoidioplasty, phalloplasty, scrotoplasty, voice masculinization or feminization, hormone therapy related to gender dysphoria or intersex conditions, gender-affirming gynecological care, or voice therapy related to gender dysphoria or intersex conditions.
 This information shall be updated when an in-network provider requests its inclusion or exclusion as a provider that offers and provides gender-affirming services. Nothing in this act alters any business establishment’s obligation to provide full and equal services to customers or patients regardless of their sex and other protected characteristics, pursuant to the Unruh Civil Rights Act (Section 51 of the Civil Code) and other applicable law.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” means an individual, organization, or entity that enters into a contract with the department to provide general health care services to enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to any of the following:

(A) Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3), excluding dental managed care programs developed pursuant to Section 14087.46.

(B) Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5).

(C) Article 2.81 (commencing with Section 14087.96).

(D) Article 2.82 (commencing with Section 14087.98).

(E) Article 2.9 (commencing with Section 14088).

(F) Article 2.91 (commencing with Section
 14089).

(G) Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), excluding dental managed care plans.

(H) Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700).

(I) A county Drug Medi-Cal organized delivery system authorized under the California Medi-Cal 2020 Demonstration pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 14184), the California Advancing and Innovating Medi-Cal Demonstration pursuant to Section 14184.401,
 or a successor demonstration or waiver, as applicable.

(2) The requirements described in this section that are imposed on a “Medi-Cal managed care plan” also apply to a Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) organization operating pursuant to Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591). The sanctions described in subdivision (b) also apply to a PACE organization, which may be imposed by the department or the State Department of Public Health pursuant to Section 14592 or any other provisions applicable to PACE organizations.

(3) “TGI” means transgender, gender diverse, or intersex.

(4) “TGI-serving organization” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section
 150900 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) “Trans-inclusive health care” means comprehensive health care that is consistent with the standards of care for individuals who identify as TGI, honors an individual’s personal bodily autonomy, does not make assumptions about an individual’s gender, accepts gender fluidity and nontraditional gender presentation, and treats everyone with compassion, understanding, and respect.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions,
 until regulations are adopted.

(2) The department shall adopt regulations for purposes of this section by July 1, 2027, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, until regulations are adopted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 822, Sec. 7.   (SB 923)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14197.1.

(a) The department shall ensure that all covered mental health benefits and substance use disorder benefits, as those terms are defined in Section 438.900 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, are provided in compliance with Parts 438, 440, 456, and 457 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended March 30, 2016, as published in the Federal Register (81 Fed. Reg. 18390), and any subsequent amendment to those regulations, and any associated federal
 policy guidance issued by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, may implement, interpret, or make specific this subdivision by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time regulations are adopted. In doing so, the director shall consult with managed care plans and consumer advocates. By July 1,
 2022, the department shall adopt regulations, where appropriate, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) The department shall make any findings of noncompliance and corrective action plans available on its Internet Web site.

(d) For purposes of this section, “Medi-Cal managed care plan” means any individual, organization, or entity that enters into a contract with the department to provide services to enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to any of the following:

(1) Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3), excluding dental managed care programs developed pursuant to Section 14087.46.

(2) Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5).

(3) Article 2.81 (commencing with Section 14087.96).

(4) Article 2.82 (commencing with Section 14087.98).

(5) Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089).

(6) Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), excluding dental managed care plans.

(7) Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700).

(8) A county Drug Medi-Cal organized delivery system authorized under the California Medi-Cal 2020 Demonstration, Number 11-W-00193/9, as approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and described in the Special Terms and Conditions. For purposes of this subdivision, “Special Terms and Conditions” shall have the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (o) of Section 14184.10.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 768, Sec. 3.   (SB 171)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14197.11.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, subject to subdivisions (e) and (g), the department may enter into one or more comprehensive risk contracts with an alternate health care service plan (AHCSP) to serve as a primary Medi-Cal managed care plan for eligible beneficiaries described in subdivision (b) in geographic regions that are designated by the department pursuant to subdivision (c) and that are regions in which the AHCSP
 already provides commercial coverage in the individual, small group, or large group market.

(b) The following beneficiary populations enrolling in Medi-Cal managed care shall be eligible to enroll, or choose to maintain their enrollment, in an AHCSP contracted with the department pursuant to subdivision (a):

(1) A beneficiary who was previously a member of the AHCSP as their Medi-Cal managed care plan at any point from January 1, 2023, to December 31, 2023, inclusive.

(2) An existing member of the AHCSP who is transitioning into Medi-Cal managed care.

(3) A beneficiary who was a member of the AHCSP at any time during
 the 12 months preceding the effective date of the beneficiary’s Medi-Cal eligibility.

(4) A beneficiary with an AHCSP family linkage.

(5) A beneficiary who was previously enrolled in a primary Medi-Cal managed care plan other than the AHCSP at any point from January 1, 2023, to December 31, 2023, inclusive, but who was assigned to, and made the responsibility of, the AHCSP under a subcontract with the Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(6) A dual eligible beneficiary residing in a geographic region approved by the department for purposes of this subdivision and for which the department has contracted with the AHCSP pursuant to subdivision (a).

(7) A
 beneficiary who is in foster care in this state or is otherwise eligible on the basis of their receipt of services through a child welfare agency pursuant to Section 300 or a former foster youth eligible pursuant to Section 14005.28 residing in a geographic region for which the department has contracted with the AHCSP pursuant to subdivision (a). A beneficiary who was previously enrolled in the AHCSP as their primary Medi-Cal managed care plan under this paragraph may remain in the AHCSP even if the beneficiary is no longer receiving services through a child welfare agency pursuant to Section 300.

(8) (A) A beneficiary not listed in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, who resides in a geographic region for which the department has contracted with the AHCSP pursuant to subdivision (a) and is assigned to the AHCSP according to the
 department’s default enrollment process for beneficiaries that fail to elect a Medi-Cal managed care plan in accordance with Section 14016.5. The department shall annually determine the rate of default enrollment for beneficiaries into the AHCSP in each applicable county or geographic region based on the AHCSP’s projected capacity.

(B) If the default enrollment into the AHCSP described in subparagraph (A) results in a default rate of 20 percent or higher for two consecutive months in an applicable county or counties as described in subdivision (c) of Section 14016.55, the department may elect not to conduct a one-time beneficiary survey, notwithstanding the requirement of subdivision (c) of Section 14016.55.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may contract with
 an AHCSP as a Medi-Cal managed care plan in any geographic region of the state for which federal approval is available and received pursuant to subdivision (g), for which the AHCSP maintains appropriate licensure or an approved exemption from the Department of Managed Health Care, and in which the AHCSP already provides commercial coverage in the individual, small group, or large group market. To the extent permissible under federal law, the department may enter into either a single comprehensive risk contract for all geographic areas where the
 AHCSP is approved to operate as a Medi-Cal managed care plan or multiple contracts to serve the different geographic areas. If the department enters into a single comprehensive risk contract, capitation rates shall be determined on a county or regional basis.

(1) The AHCSP shall not deny enrollment to any individual eligible pursuant to subdivision (b) unless the department or the Department of Managed Health Care has ordered the AHCSP to cease enrollment in an applicable service area.

(2) (A) The AHCSP shall not, on its own, disenroll any eligible beneficiary described in subdivision (b).

(B) The Health Care Options Program shall
 disenroll any member of an AHCSP if the member meets any one of the reasons for disenrollment enumerated in Section 53891 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, except that the Health Care Options Program shall not disenroll a member
 who meets the conditions described in subdivision (f) of Section 53845 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations. The Health Care Options Program shall follow the disenrollment process described in Section 53889 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) Except for those standards and requirements relating to beneficiary enrollment that the department determines are inapplicable to the AHCSP, the comprehensive risk contract or contracts with the AHCSP pursuant to this section shall include the same standards and requirements as those for other Medi-Cal managed care plans, including any requirements imposed by the CalAIM Terms and Conditions, as the term is defined in subdivision (c) of Section 14184.101, and any terms and conditions imposed by a successor federal waiver or demonstration
 project and the same standards and requirements as for other Medi-Cal managed care plans in effect at that time.

(4) (A) In addition to the comprehensive risk contract or contracts described in this section, the AHCSP shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the department to memorialize any standards or requirements that are in addition to, or different than, those imposed on other Medi-Cal managed care plans as described in paragraph (3). Upon execution, the department shall post the memorandum of understanding on
 its internet website.

(B) The memorandum of understanding entered into pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall include, but need not be limited to, the AHCSP’s commitment to increase enrollment of new Medi-Cal members over the course of the relevant contract terms and any requirements related to the AHCSP’s collaboration with, and support of, applicable safety net providers, including federally
 qualified health centers (FQHCs), as follows:

(i) The AHCSP shall work with FQHCs in AHCSP service areas selected by the AHCSP and the department, at the request of the FQHC, to provide assistance with population health management and clinical transformation.

(ii) The department and the AHCSP shall identify the highest need specialties and geographic areas where the AHCSP will provide, using the AHCSP’s physicians, outpatient specialty care and services to address related needs, including, but not limited to, diagnostic testing and outpatient procedures for Medi-Cal beneficiaries who are not enrollees of the AHCSP.

(C) Within six months after the end of each applicable rating period for which the department
 contracts with the AHCSP pursuant to this section, commencing with the 2024 calendar year, the department shall publish a report describing the implementation of those standards and requirements imposed by the memorandum of understanding for the applicable rating period and post the report on its internet website.

(5) During the relevant terms of the contracts entered into pursuant to subdivision (a), the AHCSP shall periodically consult with counties and other affected local stakeholders in those geographic regions in which the AHCSP operates, in a form and manner as directed by the department. The AHCSP shall enter into memoranda of understanding with local agencies pursuant to Medi-Cal managed care contract requirements.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that Medi-Cal beneficiaries enrolled in the AHCSP be assigned to a primary care physician who is contracted with the AHCSP through its exclusive contracts with a single medical group subject to the limitations imposed by federal law.

(e) Except when an AHCSP was already contracted with the department as a Medi-Cal managed care plan as of January 1, 2022, contracts entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be effective no sooner than January 1, 2024.

(f) Before the initial effective date of a contract entered into pursuant to this section, the department shall conduct an assessment of the AHCSP’s readiness to meet behavioral health network adequacy requirements pursuant to Medi-Cal managed care contract requirements and Section 14197 and shall post those findings on the department’s internet website, including any corrective action plan imposed due to noncompliance and the department’s basis for that finding of noncompliance, if any.

(g) The department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary
 to implement this section. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(h) The capitation rates established for contracts entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be set annually in accordance with Section 14301.1. It is the intent of the Legislature that all Medi-Cal managed care plans be
 paid in an actuarially sound manner according to the projected acuity of the populations they serve under contract with the department.

(i) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of plan letters or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(j) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(k) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Alternate health care service plan” means a nonprofit health care service plan with at least 4,000,000 enrollees statewide that owns or operates pharmacies and provides professional medical services to enrollees in specific geographic regions through an exclusive contract with a single medical group in each specific geographic region in which it is licensed pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code). If the AHCSP cannot comply with any terms of the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act, it shall request a
 modification of its license from the Department of Managed Health Care pursuant to Section 1352 of the Health and Safety Code, including regulations promulgated thereunder, or request an exemption from the Department of Managed Health Care pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1343 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “AHCSP family linkage” includes when any of the following individuals are current AHCSP members on the effective date of the beneficiary’s Medi-Cal eligibility.

(A) A beneficiary’s spouse or domestic partner.

(B) A beneficiary’s dependent child, foster child, or stepchild under 26 years of age.

(C) A beneficiary’s dependent who is
 disabled and over 21 years of age.

(D) A parent or stepparent of a beneficiary under 26 years of age.

(E) A beneficiary’s grandparent, guardian, foster parent, or other relative of a beneficiary under 26 years of age with appropriate documentation of familial relationship, as determined by the department.

(3) “Comprehensive risk contract” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 438.2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(4) “Dual eligible beneficiary” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 14184.200.

(5) “Medi-Cal managed
 care plan” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101.

(6) “Member” means an enrollee of the AHCSP. A beneficiary is not an enrollee solely by virtue of receiving a service through an AHCSP provider or AHCSP-contracted provider.

(l) In 2026, the department shall report to the health and fiscal committees of the Legislature to provide an update on the implementation of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 73, Sec. 4.   (AB 2724)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14197.2.

(a) This section implements the state option in subsection (j) of Section 438.8 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) Commencing July 1, 2019, a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall comply with a minimum 85 percent medical loss ratio (MLR) consistent with Section 438.8 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The ratio shall be calculated and reported for each MLR reporting year by the Medi-Cal managed care plan consistent with Section 438.8 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) (1) Effective for contract rating periods commencing on or after July 1, 2023, a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall provide a remittance for an MLR reporting year if the
 ratio for that MLR reporting year does not meet the minimum MLR standard of 85 percent. The department shall determine the remittance amount on a plan-specific basis for each rating region of the plan and shall calculate the federal and nonfederal share amounts associated with each remittance.

(2) After the department returns the requisite federal share amounts associated with any remittance funds collected in any applicable fiscal year to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the remaining amounts remitted by a Medi-Cal managed care plan pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the
 General Fund.

(d) Except as otherwise required under this section, and until June 30, 2022, the requirements under this section do not apply to a health care service plan under a subcontract with a Medi-Cal managed care plan to provide covered health care services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries enrolled in the Medi-Cal managed care plan. This subdivision shall be inoperative on July 1, 2022.

(e) The department shall post on its internet website all of the following information:

(1) The aggregate MLR of all Medi-Cal managed care plans.

(2) The MLR of each Medi-Cal managed care plan, and, as applicable, the MLR of each subcontractor plan or other delegated entity, under contract with the Medi-Cal managed care plan, that is required to
 report an MLR pursuant to the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(3) Any required remittances owed by each Medi-Cal managed care plan, and, as applicable, any required remittances owed by each subcontractor plan or other delegated entity to that Medi-Cal managed care plan pursuant to the CalAIM Terms and Conditions.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Medical loss ratio (MLR) reporting year” shall have the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 438.8 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) “Medi-Cal managed care plan”
 means any individual, organization, or entity that enters into a contract with the department to provide services to enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to any of the following:

(A) Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3).

(B) Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5).

(C) Article 2.81 (commencing with Section 14087.96).

(D) Article 2.82 (commencing with Section 14087.98).

(E) Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089).

(F) Article 1 (commencing with Section 14200) of Chapter 8.

(G) Article 7 (commencing with Section 14490) of Chapter 8.

(3) “CalAIM Terms and Conditions” shall have the same meaning as that term is defined in subdivision (c) of Section 14184.101.

(g) The department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary to implement this section. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(h) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 93.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14197.3.

(a) A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall give a beneficiary timely and adequate notice of an adverse benefit determination in writing consistent with the requirements in Sections 438.404, 438.408, and 438.10 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. For purposes of this subdivision, “adverse benefit determination” means either of the following:

(1) Any action described in Section 10950.

(2) Any health care service eligible for coverage and payment under a Medi-Cal managed care plan contract that has been denied, modified, or delayed by a decision of the Medi-Cal managed care plan, or by one of its contracting providers.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall resolve an appeal no more than 30 calendar days from the day the Medi-Cal managed care plan receives the appeal.

(c) A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall resolve an expedited appeal no longer than 72 hours after the Medi-Cal managed care plan receives the appeal. A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall establish and maintain an expedited review process for a beneficiary or the beneficiary’s provider to request an expedited resolution of an appeal based on either of the following circumstances:

(1) If the Medi-Cal managed care plan determines, for a request from the beneficiary, or the provider indicates, in making the request on the beneficiary’s behalf or supporting the beneficiary’s request, that taking the time for a standard resolution under the timeframe described in subdivision (b) could
 seriously jeopardize the beneficiary’s life, physical or mental health, or ability to attain, or regain, maximum function.

(2) When the beneficiary’s condition is such that the beneficiary faces an imminent and serious threat to his or her health, including, but not limited to, the potential loss of life, limb, or other major bodily function, or the timeframe described in subdivision (b) would be detrimental to the beneficiary’s life or health or could jeopardize the beneficiary’s ability to regain maximum function.

(d) For purposes of this section, “Medi-Cal managed care plan” means any individual, organization, or entity that enters into a contract with the department to provide services to enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to any of the following:

(1) Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3), including
 dental managed care programs developed pursuant to Section 14087.46.

(2) Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5).

(3) Article 2.81 (commencing with Section 14087.96).

(4) Article 2.82 (commencing with Section 14087.98).

(5) Article 2.9 (commencing with Section 14088).

(6) Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089).

(7) Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), including dental managed care plans.

(8) Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700).

(9) A county Drug Medi-Cal organized delivery
 system authorized under the California Medi-Cal 2020 Demonstration, Number 11-W-00193/9, as approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and described in the Special Terms and Conditions. For purposes of this subdivision, “Special Terms and Conditions” shall have the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (o) of Section 14184.10.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 738, Sec. 7.   (AB 205)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14197.4.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:
